Hawaii statutes.
§436B-15 Fees and expenses. No
applicant or licensee shall be granted a license pursuant to the licensing laws
unless the appropriate fees have been paid. Unless otherwise provided by law,
the director shall establish the amount for all fees and expenses by rules
adopted pursuant to chapter 91. The fees to be established by the director may
include but not be limited to an application fee, filing fee, license fee,
renewal fee, examination fee, and other reasonable and necessary fees related
to the department's administrative costs. Unless otherwise provided by law,
the fees shall be deposited with the director to the credit of the compliance
resolution fund established pursuant to section 26-9(o). [L 1991, c 111, pt of
§2; am L 1992, c 202, §14; am L 1997, c 232, §1]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next